District of Columbia statutes.
8-905

Forfeitures.

All motor vehicles which are used, or intended to be used, to transport, or in any manner to facilitate a violation of this chapter shall be subject to forfeiture. All seizures and forfeitures of motor vehicles under this section shall follow the standards and procedures set forth in D.C. Law 20-278.

History

May 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-117, § 6, 41 DCR 524
June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-278, § 303, 62 DCR 1920

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-902.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2915.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-278 rewrote the section.

Temporary Legislation

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 8-901.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 20-278, referred to in the last sentence, enacted Chapter 3 of Title 41 (§ 41-301 et seq.), made amendments to the criminal offenses in §§ 48-901.02 and 48-905.02, and made conforming amendments to §§ 7-2507.06a, 8-905, 22-902, 22-1705, 22-2723, 32-1343, 48-905.03, and 50-1501.04.